Massachusetts, session 194th, S2965.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 115A of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- For the purposes of this section, the
calculation of a retail establishment’s sales volume shall exclude gross receipts from the sale of:
(i) lottery tickets or shares sold pursuant to chapter 10; and (ii) prepaid gift cards or stored value
cards, regardless of where any such card may be redeemed, which are sold to consumers at face
value or a premium or discount thereto.
of 1